Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Guardianship and Conservatorship for Disabled Persons

Legislative Research Commission Note.

Although 1980 Acts Chapter 396, which would have become operative on July 1, 1982, was repealed by 1982 Acts Chapter 141, Section 146, the latter is substantially the same bill and became operative on July 1, 1982.

387.500.
Declaration of legislative purpose.

It is the intent and purpose of the General Assembly to recognize that disabled persons have varying degrees of disability.

Persons who are only partially disabled must be legally protected without a determination of total incompetency and without the attendant deprivation of civil and legal rights that such a determination requires.

To this end, guardianship and conservatorship for disabled persons shall be utilized only as is necessary to promote their well-being, including protection from neglect, exploitation, and abuse; shall be designed to encourage the development of maximum self-reliance and independence in each person; and shall be ordered only to the extent necessitated by each person’s actual mental and adaptive limitations.

If the court determines that some form of guardianship or conservatorship is necessary, partial guardianship or partial conservatorship shall be the preferred form of protection and assistance for a disabled person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 1, 1982.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

The chairman of the guardianship subcommittee of the 1980-82 Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary Statutes, in a letter to the Deputy Director and Reviser of Statutes, dated 2-7-86, has stated as follows: “As indicated in Senate Bill 35, in Section 1, ‘Guardianship and conservatorship for disabled persons shall be utilized only as is necessary to promote their well-being, including protection from neglect, exploitation and abuse.’”

“It was the intent of Senate Bill 35 that guardianship and conservatorship for disabled persons be established only when necessary and if partial guardianship or conservatorship was appropriate, it was preferable. It certainly was not our intent that every disabled person have a guardian or conservator appointed.

“If the disabled person owns a substantial amount of property, a guardianship or conservatorship would be advisable.”

387.510.
Definitions for KRS 387.500 to 387.770 and 387.990.

As used in KRS

387.500

to

387.770

and

387.990

:

“Conservator” means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the court to manage the financial resources of a disabled person;

“Limited conservator” means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the court to assist in managing the financial resources of a partially disabled person and whose powers and duties have been specifically enumerated by court order;

“Guardian” means any individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the court to manage the personal affairs of a disabled person;

“Limited guardian” means an individual, agency, or corporation appointed by the court to assist in managing the personal affairs of a partially disabled person and whose powers and duties have been specifically enumerated by court order;

“Standby” guardian or conservator means a person or entity designated by the court to assume the powers and duties assigned to a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator upon his death, resignation, removal, or incapacity;

“Testamentary” guardian or conservator means an individual, agency, or corporation nominated in the will of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator to succeed the testator in that capacity upon his death;

“Developmental disability” means a severe, chronic disability of a person which:

Is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental and physical impairments, including pervasive developmental disorder;

Is manifested before the person attains age twenty-two (22);

Is likely to continue indefinitely;

Results in substantial functional limitations in three (3) or more of the following areas of major life activity:

Self-care;

Receptive and expressive language;

Learning;

Mobility;

Self-direction;

Capacity for independent living; and

Economic self-sufficiency; and

Reflects the person’s need for a combination and sequence of special interdisciplinary or generic care, treatment, or other services which are of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated;

“Disabled” means a legal disability, not a medical disability, and is measured by functional inabilities. It refers to any person seventeen (17) years of age or older who is:

Unable to make informed decisions with respect to his personal affairs to such an extent that he lacks the capacity to provide for his physical health and safety, including but not limited to health care, food, shelter, clothing, or personal hygiene; or

Unable to make informed decisions with respect to his financial resources to such an extent that he lacks the capacity to manage his property effectively by those actions necessary to obtain, administer, and dispose of both real and personal property.

Such inability shall be evidenced by acts or occurrences within six (6) months prior to the filing of the petition for guardianship or conservatorship and shall not be evidenced solely by isolated instances of negligence, improvidence, or other behavior;

“Partially disabled” refers to an individual who lacks the capacity to manage some of his personal affairs and/or financial resources as provided in subsection (8) of this section, but who cannot be found to be fully disabled as provided therein;

“Mentally ill person” means a person with substantially impaired capacity to use self-control, judgment, or discretion in the conduct of his affairs and social relations, associated with maladaptive behavior or recognized emotional symptoms where impaired capacity, maladaptive behavior, or emotional symptoms can be related to physiological, psychological, or social factors;

“Interdisciplinary evaluation report” means a report of an evaluation of a respondent performed pursuant to the provisions of KRS

387.540

to determine whether he is partially disabled or disabled as defined herein;

“Interested person or entity” means an adult relative or friend of the respondent or ward, an official or representative of a public or private agency, corporation, or association concerned with that person’s welfare, or any other person found suitable by the court;

“Petitioner” means a person who institutes a proceeding under KRS

387.530

;

“Respondent” means an individual alleged to be a partially disabled or disabled person;

“Ward” means a person for whom a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator has been appointed;

“Committee” means a person appointed by the court prior to July 1, 1982, to have full care, custody, and control of a disabled person and his estate; and

“Personal affairs” means decisions regarding the person of an adult, including but not limited to health care, food, shelter, clothing, or personal hygiene.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 1, 1982; 1988, ch. 359, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 2002, ch. 162, § 5, effective July 15, 2002; 2018 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

A Survey of Key Issues Kentucky Elder Law, 29 N. Ky. L. Rev. 139 (2002).

ADA Amendments Issue: Note: Why the “New ADA” Requires an Individualized Inquiry as to What Qualifies as a “Major Life Activity”, 37 N. Ky. L. Rev. 441 (2010).

ADA Amendments Issue: Note: When Pigs Fly: Does the ADA Cover Individuals with Communicable Diseases such as Novel H1N1 Influenza, “Swine Flu”?, 37 N. Ky. L. Rev. 463 (2010).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Petition to Determine if Disabled (AOC 740), Form 260.02.

387.520.
Jurisdiction of District Courts — Venue — KRS 387.810 to 387.854 to govern jurisdiction between Kentucky and other states.

The District Courts shall have exclusive jurisdiction over all proceedings involving a determination of partial disability or disability, the modification of orders, the appointment and removal of guardians and conservators, and the management and settlement of their accounts.

If the respondent or ward is a resident of this state, the venue for all proceedings under KRS

387.500

to

387.770

shall be:

In the county where the respondent or ward resides;

In the county of domicile of the respondent or ward; or

In the county where the parent of the respondent or ward is domiciled if the respondent or ward is a minor. Nothing in this section shall preclude transfer of venue for good cause shown.

If no local conservator has been appointed and no petition in a disability proceeding is pending in this state, a domiciliary foreign conservator may file with a court in this state in a county in which property belonging to the disabled person is located, authenticated copies of his or her appointment and of any official bond he or she has given. Thereafter, he or she may exercise as to assets in this state all powers of a local conservator and may maintain actions and proceedings in this state subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties generally.

This section shall be subordinate to KRS

387.810

to

387.854

to the extent that those sections govern jurisdiction between Kentucky and other states.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 3, effective July 1, 1982; 2011, ch. 47, § 24, effective June 8, 2011.

387.530.
Filing of petition — Contents — Application of person or entity desiring appointment.

A petition for a determination of partial disability or disability and the appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator may be filed by any interested person or by an individual needing guardianship or conservatorship.

The petition shall set forth the following:

The name and address of the respondent;

The date of birth of the respondent, if known;

The nature and degree of the alleged disability of the respondent;

The facts and reasons supporting the need for guardianship or conservatorship;

A description and approximation of the value of the respondent’s financial resources, including government benefits, insurance entitlements, and anticipated yearly income, if known;

The names and addresses of the respondent’s next of kin, if known;

The name and address of the individual or facility, if any, having custody of the respondent;

The name, address and interest of the petitioner;

The name and address of the petitioner’s attorney, if any; and

The name and address of any person or entity appointed by the respondent as respondent’s attorney in fact under a durable power of attorney or as respondent’s surrogate to make health care decisions under an advance directive.

The petition shall be accompanied by a verified application of the person or entity desiring appointment as limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator. The application shall state the name, address, and qualifications of the applicant and his relationship to the respondent. If it is proposed that a standby limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator be designated, the petition shall also be accompanied by the application of the person or entity desiring to be so designated. Additional petitions may be filed prior to the date of the hearing by other persons desiring appointment.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 4, effective July 1, 1982; 1998, ch. 421, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 185, § 29, effective July 14, 2018.

387.540.
Interdisciplinary evaluation report.

Prior to a hearing on a petition for a determination of partial disability or disability and the appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator, an interdisciplinary evaluation report shall be filed with the court. The report may be filed as a single and joint report of the interdisciplinary evaluation team, or it may otherwise be constituted by the separate reports filed by each individual of the team. If the court and all parties to the proceeding and their attorneys agree to the admissibility of the report or reports, the report or reports shall be admitted into evidence and shall be considered by the court or the jury if one is impaneled. The report shall be compiled by at least three (3) individuals, including a physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a physician assistant, a psychologist licensed or certified under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319, and a person licensed or certified as a social worker or an employee of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services who meets the qualifications of KRS 335.080(1)(a), (b), and (c) or 335.090(1)(a), (b), and (c). The social worker shall, when possible, be chosen from among employees of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services residing or working in the area, and there shall be no additional compensation for their service on the interdisciplinary evaluation team.

At least one (1) person participating in the compilation of the report shall have knowledge of the particular disability which the respondent is alleged to have or knowledge of the skills required of the respondent to care for himself and his estate.

If the respondent is alleged to be partially disabled or disabled due to mental illness, at least one (1) person participating in the compilation of the interdisciplinary evaluation report shall be a qualified mental health professional as defined in KRS 202A.011(12). If the respondent is alleged to be partially disabled or disabled due to an intellectual disability, at least one (1) person participating in the compilation of the evaluation report shall be a qualified professional in the area of intellectual disabilities as defined in KRS 202B.010(12).

The interdisciplinary evaluation report shall contain:

A description of the nature and extent of the respondent’s disabilities, if any;

Current evaluations of the respondent’s social, intellectual, physical, and educational condition, adaptive behavior, and social skills. Such evaluations may be based on prior evaluations not more than three (3) months old, except that evaluations of the respondent’s intellectual condition may be based on individual intelligence test scores not more than one (1) year old;

An opinion as to whether guardianship or conservatorship is needed, the type of guardianship or conservatorship needed, if any, and the reasons therefor;

An opinion as to the length of time guardianship or conservatorship will be needed by the respondent, if at all, and the reasons therefor;

If limited guardianship or conservatorship is recommended, a further recommendation as to the scope of the guardianship or conservatorship, specifying particularly the rights to be limited and the corresponding powers and duties of the limited guardian or limited conservator;

A description of the social, educational, medical, and rehabilitative services currently being utilized by the respondent, if any;

A determination whether alternatives to guardianship or conservatorship are available;

A recommendation as to the most appropriate treatment or rehabilitation plan and living arrangement for the respondent and the reasons therefor;

A listing of all medications the respondent is receiving, the dosage, and a description of the impact of the medication upon the respondent’s mental and physical condition and behavior;

An opinion whether attending a hearing on a petition filed under KRS

387.530

would subject the respondent to serious risk of harm;

The names and addresses of all individuals who examined or interviewed the respondent or otherwise participated in the evaluation; and

Any dissenting opinions or other comments by the evaluators.

The evaluation report may be compiled by a community center for mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability, a licensed facility for mentally ill or developmentally disabled persons, if the respondent is a resident of such facility, or a similar agency.

In all cases where the respondent is a resident of a licensed facility for mentally ill or developmentally disabled persons and the petition is filed by an employee of that facility, the petition shall be accompanied by an interdisciplinary evaluation report prepared by the facility.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the court shall order appropriate evaluations to be performed by qualified persons or a qualified agency. The report shall be prepared and filed with the court and copies mailed to the attorneys for both parties at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing. All items specified in subsection (4) of this section shall be included in the report.

If the person evaluated is a poor person as defined in KRS

453.190

, the examiners shall be paid by the county in which the petition is filed upon an order of allowance entered by the court. Payment shall be in an amount which is reasonable as determined by the court, except no payment shall be required of the county for an evaluation performed by a salaried employee of a state agency for an evaluation performed within the course of his employment. Additionally, no payment shall be required of the county for an evaluation performed by a salaried employee of a community center for mental health or individuals with an intellectual disability or private facility or agency where the costs incurred by the center, facility, or agency are reimbursable through third-party payors. Affidavits or other competent evidence shall be admissible to prove the services rendered but not to prove their value.

The respondent may file a response to the evaluation report no later than five (5) days prior to the hearing.

The respondent may secure an independent evaluation. If the respondent is unable to pay for the evaluation, compensation for the independent evaluation may be paid by the county in an amount which is reasonable as determined by the court.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 5, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 18, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 111, § 155, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 395, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 147, § 35, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 425, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 498, § 19, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 426, § 574, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 618, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 141, § 28, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 146, § 114, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 87, § 6, effective July 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The examiners’ fees under subsection (8) of this section must be paid by the county in which the petition is filed, regardless of the wealth of the disabled person.

OAG 83-328

.

The term “third-party payors,” in subsection (8) of this section refers to medical insurers.

OAG 83-328

.

The county is responsible for payment of the examiners’ fees where a respondent dies after an examination is completed but prior to trial, and in cases where a jury determines the respondent not to be disabled since the mandatory language of subsection (8) of this section requires payment of the examiners’ fees by the county in all cases.

OAG 83-328

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

A Survey of Key Issues Kentucky Elder Law, 29 N. Ky. L. Rev. 139 (2002).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order for Examination (AOC 750), Form 260.09.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Report of Interdisciplinary Evaluation Team (AOC 765), Form 260.12.

387.550.
Hearing date and place — Notice.

If the petition is accompanied by an interdisciplinary evaluation report when filed, the court shall fix a date and a place for a hearing to be held within thirty (30) days after the filing of the petition. If no interdisciplinary evaluation report accompanies the petition when filed, the court shall fix a date and a place for a hearing to be held within sixty (60) days after the filing of the petition. The time for a hearing may be extended by the court, on motion of either party, for cause.

Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given by the clerk of the court not less than fourteen (14) days prior to the hearing to the attorneys for both parties, all persons named in the petition, and the person proposed for appointment as limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 6, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 395, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 425, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Wiederstein, Firm Hearing and Trial Dates: A Partial Answer to Reducing Delay in the Courts, Vol. 70, No. 3, May 2006, Ky. Bench & Bar 18.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Notice of Hearing, Form 260.07.

387.560.
Appointment of counsel for respondent — Compensation — Duty of county attorney.

Unless an appearance has been entered on behalf of the respondent, the court shall appoint counsel for the respondent within one (1) week of the filing of a petition for determination of disability under KRS

387.500

to

387.770

.

Appointed counsel shall be entitled to compensation for services. If counsel is appointed for a poor person as defined in KRS

453.190

, the court shall prescribe reasonable compensation to be paid by the county in which the proceeding is held in accordance with the complexity of the issues, the time involved, and other relevant considerations, except that appointed counsel shall not be compensated at a rate higher than sixty dollars ($60) an hour for time spent in court and no higher than forty dollars ($40) an hour for time spent out of court. If the petition is found to be frivolous or not brought in good faith, counsel fees shall be charged to the petitioner.

In all proceedings under KRS

387.500

to

387.770

, it shall be the duty of the county attorney to assist the petitioner, to represent the interest of the Commonwealth, and to assist the court in its inquiry by the presentation of evidence.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 7, effective July 1, 1982; 1994, ch. 338, § 6, effective July 15, 1994.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Based upon the provisions of KRS

387.600

and subsection (3) of this section, it is not the responsibility of the county attorney to advocate on behalf of the appointment of any person who has applied for appointment as guardian or conservator; subsection (3) of this section does not require the county attorney to represent any petitioner within the connotation of an adversary proceeding, but merely requires the county attorney to assist the petitioner in the preparation and filing of the petition.

OAG 83-419

.

There is no statute imposing upon the county attorney a positive duty to file the petition for determination of partial disability or disability.

OAG 83-474

.

The central role of the county attorney in disability determination proceedings is to represent the Commonwealth and, should the interest of the Commonwealth conflict with the interest of the petitioner at some stage of the proceedings, the county attorney must pursue the interest of the Commonwealth.

OAG 83-474

.

In an action involving guardianship and conservatorship for disabled persons, county attorneys are to be involved in the disability portion of the proceedings prior to the determination of the appointment of someone to be guardian.

OAG 87-72

.

A county attorney is not required to provide comprehensive legal assistance to one without means attempting to obtain appointment of a guardian or conservator for another.

OAG 91-225

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Underwood, Part-Time Prosecutors and Conflicts
of Interest: A Survey and Some Proposals, 81 Ky. L.J. 1 (1993).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Jury Instructions, Form 260.13.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order Appointing Counsel (AOC 755), Form 260.10.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Guardians and Conservators (Mentally Disabled Persons), § 260.00.

387.570.
Hearing — Burden of proof — Jury trial unless conditions for bench trial are met.

At a hearing convened pursuant to KRS

387.500

to

387.770

for the purpose of determining the disability of a respondent, the respondent shall have the right to present evidence and to confront and cross-examine all witnesses.

The hearing may be closed to the public on request of the respondent or his counsel.

The respondent shall have the right to be present at the hearing, and his presence may be waived only by his failure to appear at the hearing or upon a determination of the court that his attendance would subject him to serious risk of harm. Such determination shall be evidence only of the respondent’s inability to attend the hearing and shall not be considered in determining the need for guardianship or conservatorship.

The court may remove itself to the place of residence of the respondent to conduct the hearing in the presence of the respondent.

The burden of proof shall be on the Commonwealth to prove the disability or partial disability of the respondent by clear and convincing evidence.

The respondent will not be determined partially disabled or disabled unless at least one (1) of the persons who participated in the interdisciplinary evaluation required by KRS

387.540

testifies in person at the hearing. This section shall not be interpreted to preclude the respondent from requiring the testimony of more than one (1) person participating in the preparation of the evaluation report.

The hearing shall be a jury trial, unless:

The respondent if present, counsel for the respondent, and the attorney for the Commonwealth agree to a bench trial;

No objection to a bench trial is made by an interested person or entity; and

The interdisciplinary evaluation report prepared for the proceeding reflects a unanimous consensus of the persons preparing it that the respondent is disabled or partially disabled, the court has reviewed the report, and the court finds no cause to require a jury trial.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 8, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 395, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 2018 ch. 13, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

387.580.
Responsibilities of court or jury during a hearing — Court determinations upon finding of disability or partial disability.

At a hearing convened under KRS

387.500

to

387.770

for a determination of partial disability or disability, the court, or the jury if one is impaneled, shall:

Inquire into the nature and extent of the general intellectual functioning of the respondent;

Inquire into the respondent’s capacity to make informed decisions concerning his personal affairs and financial resources;

Determine whether the respondent is disabled, partially disabled, or has no disability in relation to the management of his financial resources; and

Determine whether the respondent is disabled, partially disabled, or has no disability in relation to the management of his personal affairs.

If the respondent is found not to be disabled or partially disabled, the petition shall be dismissed.

If the respondent is found to be disabled or partially disabled, the court shall, at the same hearing, without a jury, determine:

The type of guardian, conservator, or guardian and conservator to be appointed;

The specific legal disabilities to which the respondent is subject, if the respondent has been determined to be partially disabled;

Whether the respondent retains the right to vote;

The corresponding powers and duties of the limited guardian or limited conservator, if the respondent has been determined to be partially disabled;

The individual or entity to be appointed by the court as limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator;

The individual or entity, if any, to be appointed as standby guardian or conservator; and

The duration of the term of guardianship or conservatorship.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 9, effective July 1, 1982; 2007, ch. 58, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 13, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

387.590.
Types of guardians and conservators to be appointed — Order of appointment — Filing of judgment and order — Legal disabilities — Rights retained.

If the respondent is found partially disabled in managing his personal affairs, but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his financial resources, a limited guardian shall be appointed.

If the respondent is found partially disabled in managing his financial resources, but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his personal affairs, a limited conservator shall be appointed.

If the respondent is found partially disabled in managing both his personal affairs and financial resources, a limited guardian and a limited conservator shall be appointed. The limited guardian and the limited conservator may be the same individual, agency, or corporation.

If the respondent is found disabled in managing his personal affairs, but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his financial resources, a guardian shall be appointed.

If the respondent is found disabled in managing his financial resources, but not partially disabled or disabled in managing his personal affairs, a conservator shall be appointed.

If the respondent is found disabled in managing both his personal affairs and his financial resources, a guardian and a conservator shall be appointed. The guardian and the conservator may be the same individual, agency, or corporation.

The order of appointment of a limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator shall specify:

The type of guardianship, conservatorship, or guardianship and conservatorship to which the ward is subject;

The name and address of the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator;

The name and address of the standby guardian or conservator, if a standby guardian or conservator is designated;

The specific legal disabilities to which the respondent is subject, if the respondent has been determined to be partially disabled;

The corresponding powers and duties of the limited guardian or limited conservator, if the respondent has been determined to be partially disabled; and

The duration of the term of guardianship or conservatorship.

A limited guardian or limited conservator shall not be appointed for a term greater than five (5) years and may be appointed for a lesser period. A guardian or conservator may be appointed for a period of unlimited duration.

The judgment of partial disability or disability and the order of appointment shall be filed in the District Court. The judgment shall be indexed by the county clerk in the book in which notices of actions and encumbrances are indexed. Unless such judgment is filed and indexed, it shall not constitute notice to any subsequent bona fide purchaser for value, mortgagee, or encumbrancer.

If the respondent is determined to be disabled or partially disabled but no limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator is appointed at the hearing, the determination shall have no legal effect.

The rights of which a ward is legally deprived upon a determination of disability in managing his personal affairs and financial resources include but are not limited to the right to dispose of property, execute instruments, enter into contractual relationships, determine his living arrangements, consent to medical procedures, and obtain a motor vehicle operator’s license. A ward shall only be deprived of the right to vote if the court separately and specifically makes a finding on the record as established in KRS 387.580(3)(c).

A partially disabled or disabled person for whom a limited guardian, limited conservator, or conservator has been appointed retains all legal and civil rights except those which have by court order been designated as legal disabilities or which have been specifically granted to the limited guardian, limited conservator, or conservator. A person who is partially disabled may be subject to some but not all of the disabilities specified in subsection (7) of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 10, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2007, ch. 58, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 13, § 6, effective July 14, 2018.

387.600.
Appointment — Consideration of preference of respondent.

The court may appoint as limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator any suitable person or any entity, public or private, capable of conducting an active guardianship or conservatorship program. The court shall not ordinarily or customarily appoint the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or any other person or entity, public or private, that is directly providing services to the respondent unless no other suitable person or entity is available and willing to be appointed. Appointment of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be consistent with the provisions of KRS

210.290

.

Prior to the appointment, the court shall make a reasonable effort to question the respondent concerning his preference regarding the person or entity to be appointed limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator, and any preference indicated shall be given due consideration. If the respondent has designated another as his attorney in fact or agent by executing a power of attorney in writing, that designation shall be treated as an indication of the respondent’s preference as to the person or entity to be appointed as his limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator, and that preference shall be given due consideration. The court shall appoint the person or entity best qualified and willing to serve.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 11, effective July 1, 1982; 1992, ch. 425, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 575, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 619, effective June 20, 2005.

387.605.
Qualifications for court to consider when appointing a guardian or conservator.

The court shall give preference to people who meet the following qualifications when appointing a person as guardian or conservator:

Kinship to respondent;

Education and business experience of applicant;

Capability to handle financial affairs; and

Ability to carry out the requirements set forth in KRS

387.660

to

387.710

and

387.750

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 20, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

387.610.
Petition for renewal of appointment — Accompanying affidavits.

Prior to the expiration of a term of guardianship or conservatorship, the limited guardian, guardian, limited conservator, or conservator may petition, pursuant to KRS

387.620

, for a renewal of his appointment for a period not to exceed five (5) years. The petition shall be accompanied by verified affidavits of a physician, an advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant working within his or her scope of practice, or a psychologist licensed or certified under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319, or a person licensed or certified as a social worker or an employee of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services who meets the qualifications of KRS 335.080(1)(a), (b), and (c) or 335.090(1)(a), (b), and (c), supporting the need for the continuation of the guardianship or conservatorship.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 141, § 12, effective July 1, 1982; 1984, ch. 395, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 425, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 576, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 620, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 13, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order of Appointment of Conservator (AOC 770), Form 260.15.